Colorado statutes. TITLE 26.5 Early Childhood Programs and Services
PART 4
EARLY CHILDHOOD AND SCHOOL READINESS
LEGISLATIVE COMMISSION

26.5-1-401. Short title.

The short title of this part 4 is the "Early Childhood and School Readiness Legislative Commission Act".

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire title added, (HB 21-1304), ch. 307, p. 1853, § 4, effective July 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-6.5-201 as it existed prior to 2021.

26.5-1-402. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly finds that:

The most economically efficient time to develop children's skills and social abilities is in the very early years when developmental education across all of the four domains of early learning, family support and education, health care, social-emotional health, and mental health, can have the most effect;

Children, families, and society benefit from quality investments in early childhood development and learning. Comprehensive early childhood development provides children and their families with the resources they need for early nurturing and for early language development and learning experiences and the physical health supports they need to help them arrive at school thriving and ready to learn.

High-quality early childhood care and learning during the crucial growth years from birth to five years of age is necessary to enable children to succeed when they start kindergarten and as they continue their education;

Research demonstrates that parental support and involvement, combined with a high-quality preschool education program, increases students' school readiness and achievement in kindergarten and significantly contributes to overcoming the effects of students' varying socioeconomic circumstances; and

Research further shows that improving educational performance through improved school readiness costs much less than special education, remediation, and grade retention.

The general assembly concludes therefore that it is in the best interests of the state to create a legislative commission to meet on a regular basis throughout the year to study issues and recommend legislation concerning early childhood and school readiness, including health care, mental health, parental involvement, family support, child care, and early learning.

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire title added, (HB 21-1304), ch. 307, p. 1853, § 4, effective July 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-6.5-202 as it existed prior to 2021.

26.5-1-403. Early childhood and school readiness legislative commission - creation - membership - duties - funding.

There is created a legislative commission for policy improvement related to early childhood and school readiness, including the areas of health, mental health, parental involvement, family support, child care, and early learning, referred to in this part 4 as the "commission".

The commission consists of six members, appointed for terms of three years; except that, of the members first appointed, two members shall be appointed for one-year terms, two members shall be appointed for two-year terms, and two members shall be appointed for three-year terms. The appointing authorities shall jointly determine which commission members serve reduced terms. Each commission member serves at the pleasure of the applicable appointing authority. Vacancies shall be filled by appointment of the original appointing authority for the remainder of the unexpired term. Initial appointments to the commission shall be made on or before July 1, 2013, as follows:

The president of the senate shall appoint two senators to serve on the commission, one of whom serves on the senate education committee, or any successor committee, and one of whom serves on the senate health and human services committee, or any successor committee;

The minority leader of the senate shall appoint one senator to serve on the commission who also serves on the senate education committee, or any successor committee;

The speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint two representatives to serve on the commission, one of whom serves on the education committee of the house of representatives, or any successor committee, and one of whom serves on the public health care and human services committee of the house of representatives, or any successor committee; and

The minority leader of the house of representatives shall appoint one representative to serve on the commission who also serves on the education committee of the house of representatives, or any successor committee.

The president of the senate shall select the first chair of the commission, and the speaker of the house of representatives shall select the first vice-chair. The chair and vice-chair must alternate annually thereafter between the two houses. The chair and vice-chair of the commission may establish such organizational and procedural rules as are necessary for the operation of the commission.

The members of the commission must receive compensation and reimbursement for expenses incurred in fulfilling the duties of the commission as provided in section 2-2-326.

The commission may meet up to four times annually. The director of research of the legislative council and the director of the office of legislative legal services shall provide staff assistance to the commission. The commission shall study issues concerning early childhood and school readiness, including but not limited to health care, mental health, parental involvement, family support, child care, and early learning. The commission shall solicit input from members of the public, especially those individuals with expertise related to early childhood and school readiness issues, to aid the commission in its work. The commission shall consult with the early childhood leadership commission, created in section 26.5-1-302, with regard to policies concerning early childhood and school readiness.

The commission may accept in-kind donations in the form of administrative support from one or more nonprofit organizations.

The commission shall report to the legislative council by the date specified in rule 24 (b)(1)(D) of the joint rules of the senate and house of representatives. The report may include recommendations for legislation, including but not limited to legislation continuing the commission and an explanation of the additional time and procedures that the commission may require to achieve the commission's study goals. Legislation that the commission recommends is treated as legislation recommended by an interim committee for the purposes of the introduction deadlines and bill limitations imposed by the joint rules of the senate and house of representatives.

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire title added, (HB 21-1304), ch. 307, p. 1854, § 4, effective July 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-6.5-203 as it existed prior to 2021.

26.5-1-404. Repeal of part.

This part 4 is repealed, effective July 1, 2023.

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire title added, (HB 21-1304), ch. 307, p. 1855, § 4, effective July 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-6.5-204 as it existed prior to 2021.